Florida, session 2026, HB959.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 520.105, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
520.105 Convenience fee for processing electronic
payments.—
(1) As used in this section, the term:
(a) "ACH payment" means a payment via an automated
clearinghouse electronic transfer from a retail buyer's bank
account.
(b) "Electronic payment" means a payment made by credit
card, debit card, electronic funds transfer, electronic check,
or other electronic method.
(2) A holder of a retail installment contract, or its
agent, may collect a fee for processing a retail buyer's
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb959-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 959 2026
electronic payment under the retail installment contract,
provided that all of the following conditions are met:
(a) The fee is reasonably related to the actual expense
incurred by the holder, or its agent, in processing the
electronic payment.
(b) The fee does not exceed the lesser of $10 or 3 percent
of the amount of the payment.
(c) The holder, or its agent, does all of the following:
1. Allows the retail buyer to make a payment by a method
other than the method that incurs a fee.
2. Maintains an option for a retail buyer to make an ACH
payment without collecting a fee.
3. Does not establish electronic payment as the expected
form of payment.
4. Before the retail buyer agrees to make a payment by a
method that incurs a fee, discloses all of the following:
a. The amount of the fee to be charged under this section.
b. The retail buyer's option to make a payment by an
alternative method that does not incur a fee, including by cash,
check, money order, or ACH payment.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb959-01-c1